District of Columbia statutes.
25-735

Gifts and loans from manufacturer prohibited.

(a)

A manufacturer, whether or not licensed under this title, shall not engage in the following transactions with a wholesale or retail licensee:

(1)

Loan or give money;

(2)

Sell, rent, loan, or give equipment, furniture, fixtures, or property; or

(3)

Give or sell a service.

(b)

A retail licensee shall not engage in the following transactions with a manufacturer, whether or not licensed under this title:

(1)

Receive or accept a loan or gift of money;

(2)

Purchase from, rent from, borrow, or receive by gift equipment, furniture, fixtures, or property; or

(3)

Accept or receive a service.

(c)

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, with the prior approval of the Board, a manufacturer may sell, give, rent, or loan to a retail licensee any service or article of property costing the manufacturer not more than $500 and a retail licensee may purchase from, rent from, borrow, or receive by gift from a manufacturer any service or article of property costing the manufacturer not more than $500.

(d)

Notwithstanding subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this section, with the prior approval of the Board, a manufacturer may sell, give, rent, or loan to a retail licensee computer equipment for the purpose of tracking the sale or delivery of alcoholic beverages.

(e)

Notwithstanding subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this section, employees or agents of a manufacturer, whether licensed by this title or not, may work or serve alcoholic beverages at a licensed establishment during an event promoting alcoholic beverages manufactured by the manufacturer without Board approval.

(f)

Notwithstanding subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this section, a manufacturer, whether licensed by this title or not, may donate alcoholic beverages to the holder of a temporary license or a festival license or a nonprofit organization that does not hold a retailer’s license without Board approval.

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 330, ch. 4, § 18
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 902, ch. 756, § 15
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 10, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(6), 30 DCR 5927
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-187, § 101(aa), 51 DCR 6525
Mar. 9, 2016, D.C. Law 21-84, § 2(e)(2), 63 DCR 781
1981 Ed., § 25-735.
1973 Ed., § 25-119.
D.C. Law 15-187, in subsecs. (b) and (c), deleted “wholesale or” preceding “retail licensee”; and added subsec. (d).
The 2016 amendment by D.C. Law 21-84 added (e) and (f).